dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- basla; bas; 2 -->
    <pardef n="bas/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċarruta; ċ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/arruta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arruta</l>
          <r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raret</l>
          <r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieret</l>
          <r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- grossa; gros; 2 -->
    <pardef n="gros/sa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ismar; ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="/ismar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ismar</l>
          <r>ismar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>somor</l>
          <r>ismar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċinta; ċin; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċin/ta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tifel; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/ifel__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ifel</l>
          <r>ifel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fal</l>
          <r>ifel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħliqa; ħl; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħl/iqa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iqa</l>
          <r>iqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjaq</l>
          <r>iqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- forġa; for; 2 -->
    <pardef n="for/ġa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ġa</l>
          <r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oġ</l>
          <r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħaxix; ħ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħ/axix__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>axix</l>
          <r>axix<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>xejjex</l>
          <r>axix<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għodda; għod; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għod/da__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mus; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/us__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wies</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xifer; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/ifer__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ifer</l>
          <r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>far</l>
          <r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xafra; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/afra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afra</l>
          <r>afra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fafar</l>
          <r>afra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- serkin; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/erkin__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erkin</l>
          <r>erkin<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieken</l>
          <r>erkin<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sikkina; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/ikkina__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikkina</l>
          <r>ikkina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kieken</l>
          <r>ikkina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċarru; ċar; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċar/ru__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ru</l>
          <r>ru<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ru<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- rukkell; r; 2 -->
    <pardef n="r/ukkell__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ukkell</l>
          <r>ukkell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiekel</l>
          <r>ukkell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qabar; q; 3 -->
    <pardef n="q/abar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abar</l>
          <r>abar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bura</l>
          <r>abar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>obra</l>
          <r>abar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pożaumbrella; pożaumbrel; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pożaumbrel/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- newl; n; 2 -->
    <pardef n="n/ewl__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ewl</l>
          <r>ewl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiel</l>
          <r>ewl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qamar; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/amar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amar</l>
          <r>amar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mura</l>
          <r>amar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- borġ; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/orġ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orġ</l>
          <r>orġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raġ</l>
          <r>orġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lupu; l; 2 -->
    <pardef n="l/upu__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>upu</l>
          <r>upu<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pup</l>
          <r>upu<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- manka; man; 2 -->
    <pardef n="man/ka__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="basla"><i>bas</i><par n="bas/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċarruta"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/arruta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="grossa"><i>gros</i><par n="gros/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ismar"><i></i><par n="/ismar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċinta"><i>ċin</i><par n="ċin/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tifel"><i>t</i><par n="t/ifel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħliqa"><i>ħl</i><par n="ħl/iqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="forġa"><i>for</i><par n="for/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħaxix"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/axix__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għodda"><i>għod</i><par n="għod/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mus"><i>m</i><par n="m/us__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xifer"><i>x</i><par n="x/ifer__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xafra"><i>x</i><par n="x/afra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serkin"><i>s</i><par n="s/erkin__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sikkina"><i>s</i><par n="s/ikkina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċarru"><i>ċar</i><par n="ċar/ru__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rukkell"><i>r</i><par n="r/ukkell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qabar"><i>q</i><par n="q/abar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pożaumbrella"><i>pożaumbrel</i><par n="pożaumbrel/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="newl"><i>n</i><par n="n/ewl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qamar"><i>q</i><par n="q/amar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="borġ"><i>b</i><par n="b/orġ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lupu"><i>l</i><par n="l/upu__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="manka"><i>man</i><par n="man/ka__n_GD"/></e>
